Utah statutes.
53B-17-104.   Responsibilities of KUED - TV, KUER - FM, and UEN related to
public broadcasting and telecommunication for education and government.
(1)  Subject to applicable rules of the Federal Communications Commission and
Section 53B-17-102, the State Board of Regents, the State Board of Education,
and the University of Utah, KUED - TV, KUER - FM, and UEN shall:
(a)  coordinate statewide services of public radio and television;
(b)  develop, maintain, and operate statewide distribution systems for KUED -
TV, KUER - FM, and KUEN, the statewide distance learning service, the
educational data network, connections to the Internet, and other
telecommunications services appropriate for providing video, audio, and data
telecommunication services in support of public and higher education, state
government, and public libraries;
(c)  support the delivery of these services to as many communities as may be
economically and technically feasible and lawfully permissible under the
various operating licenses;
(d)  cooperate with state and local governmental and educational agencies and
provide leadership and consulting service for telecommunication for education;
(e)  represent the state with privately owned telecommunications systems to
gain access to their networks for the delivery of programs and services
sponsored or produced by public and higher education;
(f)  acquire, produce, coordinate, and distribute a variety of programs and
services of an educational, cultural, informative, and entertaining nature
designed to promote the public interest and welfare of the state;
(g)  coordinate with the state system of higher education to acquire, produce,
and distribute broadcast and nonbroadcast college credit telecourses,
teleconferences, and other instructional and training services;
(h)  coordinate with the State Board of Education and school districts to
acquire, produce, and distribute broadcast and nonbroadcast telecourses,
teleconferences, and other instructional and training services to the public
schools;
(i)  act as a clearing house for the materials, courses, publications, media,
software, and other applicable information related to the items addressed in
Subsections (1)(g) and (h);
(j)  coordinate with the State Board of Education to assist in providing the
public schools of Utah with the following services:
(i)  broadcast, during school hours, of educational and administrative
programs recommended by the State Board of Education;
(ii)  duplication and encoding of program masters for broadcast purposes; and
(iii)  program previewing;
(k)  share responsibility with the State Board of Education for Instructional
Television (ITV) awareness and utilization; and
(l)  provide teleconference and training services for state and local
governmental agencies.
(2)  UEN shall:
(a)  consult with the UEN steering committee authorized in Section 53B-17-102
and other technology coordinating committees established by the State Board of
Education and State Board of Regents in acquiring, producing, and distributing
instructional content;
(b)  coordinate the statewide development and implementation of the data
network for education, which shall include video and audio, data connections,
and connection to the Internet, utilizing satellite, microwave, fiber-optic,
and other transmission media;
(c)  utilize statewide economic development criteria in the design and
implementation of the educational telecommunications infrastructure;
(d)  assure that public service entities such as educators, public service
providers, and public broadcasters are provided access to the
telecommunications infrastructures that are developed in the state.
(3)  If the network operated by the Department of Technology Services is not
available, UEN may provide network connections to the central administration
of counties and municipalities for the sole purpose of transferring data to a
secure facility for backup and disaster recovery.
(4)  This section neither regulates nor restricts a privately owned company in
the distribution or dissemination of education programs.
